Rhode Island statutes. Title 29 Libraries
Chapter 3.1 Office of Library and Information Services

29-3.1-1.
Office of library and information services.

Within the department of administration, division of enterprise technology strategy and services, there shall be an office of library and information services under the direction of a chief of library services who shall be appointed by the director of administration and supervised by the chief digital information officer. The office is hereby empowered to cooperate with the Institute of Museum and Library Services of the United States of America in the carrying out of the purposes of any and all acts of Congress for the benefit of library and information services within this state. The office is hereby designated as the agency for the administration of any plan, or plans, heretofore or hereafter formulated, in conformity with any act, or acts, of Congress and is authorized to administer any such plan, or plans, and to enter into such agreements with the Institute of Museum and Library Services of the United States of America as may be, from time to time, required under this chapter or any acts, or act, of Congress, and, from time to time, amend any plan or plans, except any plan, or plans, or agreements, formulated or entered into or to be administered by the board of regents, board of governors, or the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-3.1-1

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 144, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 3.

29-3.1-1.1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise indicated by the context, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:

“Interlibrary cooperation” means two (2) or more independent libraries working together to achieve a common purpose;

“Public library” means a library in a city or town that has been designated by the city or town council or town financial meeting as a library to provide library services to all individuals residing in the city or town;

“Public library development” means the activities undertaken to strengthen, improve, or initiate library services that are provided by a public library; and

“Resource sharing” means the sharing of library materials, the creation and maintenance of a statewide library catalog, providing statewide access to databases and/or staff expertise between two (2) or more libraries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 290, § 1.

29-3.1-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 2, effective July 1, 1996.

29-3.1-2.1.
[Reserved.]

29-3.1-2.2.
Library board of Rhode Island established.

There is hereby created the library board of Rhode Island, sometimes hereinafter referred to as the “library board”. The library board shall be protected from sudden changes in membership and reversal of policy by having staggered terms for its public members, and is hereby made successor to all powers, rights, duties, and privileges pertaining to public library services and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing.

The library board shall consist of fifteen (15) members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, five (5) of whom shall be representative of general library users. The remainder of the governor’s appointments shall be representative of the following:

Users of the Talking Books Library, the economically disadvantaged, and corporate or special librarians; school library media specialists;

Librarians serving people who are institutionalized;

Public library trustees and statewide library advocacy group; and

Librarians from small public libraries, librarians from large or medium public libraries, and academic librarians.

The commissioner for elementary and secondary education, or a designee, and the commissioner for higher education, or a designee, shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members.

The governor shall appoint from the library board’s public members a chairperson. The board may elect from among its members such other officers as it deems necessary.

Board members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be allowed travel expenses related to attendance at board meetings.

No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board unless he or she is a resident of this state.

Members of the board shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the provisions of §

36-1-7

and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 66; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 66; P.L. 2000, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 23; P.L. 2021, ch. 282, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 283, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

29-3.1-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 2, effective July 1, 1996.

29-3.1-3.1.
Appointment of members of the library board.

The governor shall, with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint the members of the library board. Appointments shall be made for terms of three (3) years commencing on January 1st in the year of appointment and ending on December 31st in the third year thereafter.

A member shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified. Any vacancy among the public members of the board shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. Public members shall not be appointed for more than two (2) successive three-year terms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 375, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 2.

29-3.1-3.2.
Removal of public members of library board.

Public members of the library board shall be removable by the governor only for cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 2.

29-3.1-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 2, effective July 1, 1996.

29-3.1-4.1.
Powers and duties of library board.

The library board shall communicate with, and seek the advice of, the chief of library services and all those concerned with, and affected by, its determinations as a regular procedure in arriving at its conclusions and in setting policy. The library board, however, shall not engage in the operation or administration of any library.

The library board shall have the following powers and duties:

To approve a systematic program of information gathering, processing, and analysis addressed to every aspect of public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing in this state, especially as that information relates to current and future library and information service needs, so that current needs may be met with reasonable promptness and plans formulated to meet future needs as they arise in the most efficient and economical manner possible;

To approve a master plan defining broad goals and objectives for public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing in the state. These goals and objectives shall be expressed in terms of the library and information services to which individuals will have access. The library board shall continually evaluate the efforts and results of the library and information services in the light of these objectives;

To approve board policy to implement the goals and objectives established and adopted by the library board from time to time; and to adopt and require enforcement of standards and regulations for public library services and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing;

To determine priorities of expenditures of state revenues and other public resources made available for the support of public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing purposes; provided that nothing contained in this subsection shall authorize the library board to alter the allocation of grants or aid otherwise provided by law;

To approve annually the program for the use of federal funds submitted to the United States Institute of Museum and Library Services;

To establish such committees as necessary or desirable for the conduct of any or all aspects of public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing, and to determine all powers and functions as well as composition of committees established and to dissolve the committees when their purpose shall have been fulfilled; provided that nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed to grant the library board the power to establish subcommittees performing the duties and functions of local boards of trustees;

To exercise the following functions, powers, and duties:

To be responsible for the distribution of state aid funds for public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing;

To approve standards and regulations for public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing;

To enforce the provisions of all laws relating to public library services and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing; and

To decide and determine appeals from decisions relating to libraries of the chief of library services;

To exercise all other powers with relation to the field of public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing within this state not specifically granted to any other department, board, or agency, and not incompatible with law, which the library board may deem advisable;

To otherwise promote maximum efficiency and economy in the delivery of public library services and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing in the state;

To submit within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, and meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions or other legal matters related to authority of the council; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to the provisions of chapter 3.1 of this title; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and secretary of state’s websites as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection; and

To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the board, approved by the board, and conducted by the chair of the board. The board may approve the use of any board or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [March 31, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 1.

29-3.1-4.2.
Meetings of library board.

The library board shall hold regular meetings at least six (6) times each calendar year. All meetings of the library board of Rhode Island shall be open to the public, provided that executive sessions may be held as subordinate parts of public meetings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 375, § 3.

29-3.1-5.
Chief of library services — Appointment and qualifications.

The director of administration shall appoint a chief of library services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-3.1-5

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 1.

29-3.1-6.
Compensation of chief of library services.

The chief of library services shall be in the classified service and his or her salary shall be established in accordance with the terms of the pay plan for classified employees.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-3.1-6

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 1.

29-3.1-7.
Duties of chief of library services.

The chief of library services shall be the executive and administrative officer in charge of the office of library and information services. The chief of library services shall be in a classified position of service, shall be appointed by the director of administration and shall report to the chief digital officer. The chief of library services shall serve as the chief executive officer of the library board. The chief of library services shall also carry out the duties required by this chapter and by chapters 5 and 6 of this title. In addition to the general supervision of the office of library and information services and the appointment of the several officers and employees of the office, it shall be the duty of the chief of library services:

To develop a systematic program of information gathering, processing, and analysis addressed to every aspect of public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing in this state, especially as that information relates to current and future library and information service needs, so that current needs may be met with reasonable promptness and plans formulated to meet future needs as they arise in the most efficient and economical manner possible;

To develop a master plan defining board goals and objectives for public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing in the state. These goals and objectives shall be expressed in terms of the library and information services to which individuals will have access;

To communicate with, and seek the advice of, those concerned with, and affected by, the library board’s determinations;

To develop and implement board policy as it pertains to the goals and objectives approved by the library board from time to time;

To enforce standards and to exercise general supervision over interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing in the state;

To develop, annually, the program for the use of federal funds that is submitted to the United States Institute of Museum and Library Services;

To supervise the operation of the office of library and information services, as defined elsewhere in this title, and such other additional duties and responsibilities as may be assigned by the library board from time to time; and

To supervise the following functions:

To distribute state funds for public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing in accordance with law and regulations of the library board;

To develop standards and regulations for public library development and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing;

To certify that public library standards and services are in accordance with law and regulations of the library board;

To require the observance of all laws relating to public library services and interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing;

To interpret library law;

To give assistance, advice, and counsel to public libraries and to participants in interlibrary cooperation and resource-sharing activities;

To require that information and statistics necessary to do the work of the office of library and information services be collected, to publish findings and reports thereon;

To provide eligible persons who are impaired, blind, reading impaired and/or physically impaired with library services through the Talking Books Plus, in cooperation with the Library of Congress National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped;

To cooperate with the commissioner of elementary and secondary education in supporting and encouraging effective school library media services and their integration into statewide library networking activities;

To cooperate with the state librarian and the state law librarian in strengthening services to library users;

To cooperate with the commissioner of higher education in supporting and encouraging effective library services through the state system of higher education; and

To coordinate with all other state departments and agencies in the provision of library services to state government and to the public.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-3.1-7

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 375, §§ 4, 5; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 66; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 66; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 23.

29-3.1-8.
Gifts, donations, and funds.

The chief of library services may accept donations of funds or property, real or personal, for the office of library and information services and, in his or her discretion, with the approval of the library board, shall hold the donations in the form in which they were given for the purposes of the office of library and information services, or dispose of them, with any financial benefits accruing to the office of library and information services. The chief of library services shall be the authorized agent to accept, receive, and administer, with the approval of the library board, any and all funds, moneys, or library materials granted, furnished, provided, appropriated, and/or dedicated or made available by the United States of America or any of its departments, commissions, boards, bureaus, or agencies for library services in the state of Rhode Island other than funds, moneys, or library materials granted, furnished, provided, appropriated, and/or dedicated or made available directly to any agency or institution. The chief of library services shall turn over to the general treasurer, for proper custody and safekeeping, all the funds paid to the state from the federal treasury or other donating agency, and the general treasurer shall disburse these funds solely for the purpose provided by the original grantor upon orders drawn by the state controller upon his or her receipt of duly authenticated vouchers. Any funds lost or diverted from the purposes for which paid by the United States of America shall be repaid by the state to the United States of America.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

29-3.1-8

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 227, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 99; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 1.

29-3.1-9 — 29-3.1-12.
Repealed.

29-3.1-13.
Transfer of responsibilities.

Whenever, in any general or public law, there shall appear the words “department of state library services” or “state library services,” such words shall be deemed to refer to and to mean the “office of library and information services.” Whenever, in any general or public law, there shall appear the words “director of library services,” such words shall be deemed to refer to and to mean the “chief of library services.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 211, § 1.